Washington statutes.
RCW 36.95.060

District board—Duties—How constituted—Quorum—Officers—Filling vacancies.

The business of the district shall be conducted by the board of the television reception improvement district, hereinafter referred to as the "board". The board shall be constituted as provided under either subsection (1) or (2) of this section.

(1) The board of a district having boundaries different from the county's shall have either three, five, seven, or nine members, as determined by the board of county commissioners at the time the district is created. Each member shall reside within the boundaries of the district and shall be appointed by the board of county commissioners for a term of three years, or until his or her successor has qualified, except that the board of county commissioners shall appoint one of the members of the first board to a one-year term and two to two-year terms. There is no limit upon the number of terms to which a member may be reappointed after his or her first appointment. A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, but the majority vote of the board members shall be necessary for any action taken by the board. The board shall elect from among its members a chair and such other officers as may be necessary. In the event a seat on the board is vacated prior to the expiration of the term of the member appointed to such seat, the board of county commissioners shall appoint a person to complete the unexpired term.

(2) Upon the creation of a district having boundaries identical to those of the county (a countywide district), the county commissioners shall be the members of the board of the district and shall have all the powers and duties of the board as provided under the other sections of this chapter. The county commissioners shall be reimbursed pursuant to the provisions of RCW 36.95.070, and shall conduct the business of the district according to the regular rules and procedures applicable to meetings of the board of county commissioners.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4157; 1992 c 150 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 155 s 6.]